Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 4. Fees

§ 37-8-401.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 129, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, related to compensatory fees.

§ 37-8-402.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-402

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Section

31-18-402

was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

§ 37-8-403.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-403

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning single trip permits, temporary permits for motion picture industry vehicles, and tour buses, see §

31-18-403

.

§ 37-8-404.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-405

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning collection of fees, rules and regulations, cancellation or revocation of permits and reports, see §

31-18-405

.

§ 37-8-405.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, related to the disposition of fees and taxes.

§§ 37-8-406 through 37-8-416.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

See note catchlined “Revision of chapter” at beginning of chapter.

These sections, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 65, §§ 30, 32, 33, 39; Laws 1937, ch. 121, §§ 19 to 22; Laws 1975, ch. 143, § 1; Laws 1982, ch. 72, § 1, related to fees.